Hawaii statutes.
§183-4 General penalty. Any person
violating any of the provisions of chapters 183 to 185, for which violation a
penalty is not otherwise provided, or violating any rule or regulation of the
department of land and natural resources, and any master of any vessel which
brings into the State any article which the department shall at any time
prohibit from being imported into the State, and the master of any vessel from
which is landed any article required in chapters 183 to 185 to be inspected,
before the master has received a permit to land the articles from the
department or its officer or inspector, as in such chapters provided, shall be
fined not more than $500. [L 1903, c 44, §16; am L 1905, c 82, §2; am L 1907, c
112, §1; RL 1925, §644; RL 1935, §240; RL 1945, §1031; RL 1955, §18-18; am L Sp
1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §1; HRS §183-4; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next